Hawaii statutes.
§338-2 Authority and duties of the
department of health. The department of health, herein referred to as the
department, shall:

(1) Establish a central bureau of public health
statistics with suitable offices properly equipped for the safety and preservation
of all its official records;

(2) Install a statewide system of public health
statistics;

(3) Make and amend, after notice and hearing,
necessary regulations, give instructions and prescribe forms for collecting,
transcribing, compiling, and preserving public health statistics; and

(4) Enforce this part and the regulations made
pursuant thereto. [L 1949, c 327, §3; RL 1955, §57-2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§19; HRS §338-2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next